Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 1
LONG-TERM CARE ADMINISTRATION

25.5-6-101. Spousal protection - protection of income and resources for community spouse - definitions - amounts retained - responsibility of state department - right to appeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Community spouse" means the spouse of a person who is in an institution or nursing facility, the spouse of a person who is enrolled in the PACE program authorized pursuant to section 25.5-5-412, or the spouse of a person who is receiving home- and community-based services pursuant to this article.

"Community spouse monthly income allowance" means the amount by which the minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance exceeds the amount of monthly income that is available to the community spouse.

"Community spouse resource allowance" means the amount of assets, excluding the value of the home and other exempt resources under federal law, that the community spouse shall be allowed to retain and that shall not be available to cover an institutionalized spouse's cost of care.

"Institutionalized spouse" means an individual who is in an institution or nursing facility who is married to a spouse who is not in an institution or nursing facility.

For purposes of this section, "institutionalized spouse" includes an individual who is enrolled in the PACE program authorized pursuant to section 25.5-5-412 or is receiving home- and community-based services pursuant to this article, and who is married to a spouse who is not enrolled in the PACE program or receiving home- and community-based services.

"Minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance" means an amount which is equal to an applicable percent of the nonfarm income official poverty line (increased annually by the consumer price index for all urban consumers), as defined by the federal office of management and budget, for a family unit of two members.
(e) (I) (A) "Minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance" means an amount which is equal to an applicable percent of the nonfarm income official poverty line (increased annually by the consumer price index for all urban consumers), as defined by the federal office of management and budget, for a family unit of two members.

For the purposes of sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (I), the applicable percent shall be: As of September 30, 1989, one hundred twenty-two percent; as of July 1, 1991, one hundred thirty-three percent; as of July 1, 1992, one hundred fifty percent.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (e), the minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance may be increased on an individual basis if:

The community spouse has shelter and utilities expenses that exceed thirty percent of the minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance; except that the total allowance shall not exceed fifteen hundred dollars (increased annually by the consumer price index for all urban consumers);

Either spouse is responsible for a dependent family member, including children, parents, or siblings who reside with the community spouse; or

The community spouse has exceptional circumstances which would result in significant financial duress.

In order to implement the medical assistance program in compliance with the federal "Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988", as amended, the state department shall ensure, when an institutionalized spouse is eligible for medical assistance under this article and articles 4 and 5 of this title, that the community spouse retain a community spouse monthly income allowance but only to the extent that income of the institutionalized spouse is made available to the community spouse.

The resources available to the married couple shall be calculated at the beginning of a continuous period of institutionalization of the institutionalized spouse. The community spouse shall retain the remainder of the couple's countable resources up to the federal maximum resource allowance as a community spouse resources allowance. The institutionalized spouse may keep an amount up to the amount of resources allowed under the federal medicaid program.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), if either spouse establishes that the community spouse resource allowance is inadequate to raise the community spouse's income to the minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance, an amount adequate to provide the minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance shall be substituted.

The state board shall have the authority to promulgate any rules that are necessary to implement the provisions of this section in accordance with the federal "Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988", as amended. The rules adopted by the state board shall include, as a minimum, provisions regarding the following matters:

The treatment of a married couple's income and resources before and after eligibility for medical assistance is established, including the basis for dividing such income and resources between the two parties;

The process for appealing any determinations regarding income and resources that are made pursuant to these rules.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1907, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-506 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For provisions of the federal "Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988" referenced in this section, see section 303 of Pub.L. 100-360, codified at 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396r-5.

25.5-6-102. Court-approved trusts - transfer of property for persons seeking medical assistance for nursing home care - undue hardship - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

The state makes significant expenditures for nursing home care under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act";

A large number of persons do not have enough income to afford nursing home care, but have too much income to qualify for state medical assistance, a situation popularly referred to as the "Utah gap";

Some persons in the Utah gap, through innovative court-approved trust arrangements, have become qualified for state medical assistance, thereby increasing state medical assistance expenditures;

It is therefore appropriate to enact state laws which limit such court-approved trusts in a manner that is consistent with Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396 et seq., as amended, and which provide that persons who qualify for assistance as a result of the creation of such trusts shall be treated the same as any other recipient of medical assistance for nursing home care;

In enacting this section, the general assembly intends only to limit certain court-approved trusts and court-approved transfers of property. It is not the general assembly's intent to approve or disapprove of privately created trusts or private transfers of property made under the same or similar circumstances.

The county department shall verify that an applicant for medical assistance for nursing home care, pursuant to the provisions of this title, meets applicable eligibility criteria for assistance other than those set forth in subsection (3) of this section. Upon verification, for eligibility purposes and in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, the county department shall make a determination of the status of any court-approved trust established for or court-approved transfer of property made by or for the applicant.

If a person who applies for medical assistance for nursing home care would be deemed ineligible for assistance as a result of deeming a court-approved trust established for the applicant as a medicaid qualifying trust or as a result of deeming property in the court-approved trust as an improper transfer of assets, the person's application shall, nonetheless, be treated as a case of undue hardship and the person shall be eligible for medical assistance for said care if the establishment of the court-approved trust meets the following criteria:

The applicant's monthly gross income from all sources, without reference to the court-approved trust, exceeds the income eligibility standard for medical assistance then in effect but is less than the average private pay rate for nursing home care for the geographic region in which the applicant lives;

The property used to fund the trust shall be limited to monthly unearned income owned by the applicant, including any pension payment;

The applicant and the state medical assistance program shall be the sole beneficiaries of the trust. The entire corpus of the trust, or as much of the corpus as may be distributed each month without violating federal requirements for federal financial participation, shall be distributed each month for expenses related to the beneficiary's nursing home care that are approved under the medical assistance program; except that an amount reasonably necessary to maintain the existence of the trust and to comply with federal requirements may be retained in the trust. Deductions may be distributed from the trust to the same extent deductions from the income of a nursing home resident who is not a trust beneficiary are allowed under the medical assistance program, which shall include the following:

A monthly personal needs allowance;

Payments to the beneficiary's community spouse or dependent family members as provided and in accordance with Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396r-5, as amended, and section 25.5-6-101;

Specified health insurance costs and special medical services provided under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396a(r), as amended; and

Any other deduction provided in the rules of the state department.

Upon the death of the beneficiary, a remainder interest in the corpus of the trust shall pass to the state agency responsible for administering the state medical assistance program;

The trust shall not be subject to modification by the beneficiary or the trustee unless otherwise provided by this section or section 15-14-412.5, C.R.S.

For the purposes of this subsection (3), "medicaid qualifying trust" shall have the same meaning as set forth in Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396a(k).

The state board shall adopt rules as are necessary for the implementation of this section and as are necessary to comply with federal law. In addition, the state department shall amend the state medical assistance plan in a manner that is consistent with the provisions of this section.

This section shall take effect January 1, 1992, and shall apply to any court-approved trust established for or court-approved transfer of property made by or for a protected person applying for or receiving medical assistance for nursing home care pursuant to the provisions of this title, on or after said date; except that a court-approved trust created before said date that does not comply with this section shall be modified to comply with this section no later than July 1, 1992, before which time the court-approved trust or court-approved transfer of property to a trust shall not render the protected person ineligible for medical assistance.

The provisions of this section shall not apply if federal funds are not available for persons who would qualify for medical assistance as a result of a court-approved trust that meets the criteria set forth in this section.

This section shall apply to trusts established or transfers of property made prior to July 1, 1994. The provisions set forth in sections 15-14-412.6 to 15-14-412.9, C.R.S., and any rules adopted by the state board pursuant to section 25.5-6-103 shall apply to trusts established or property transferred on or after that date.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1908, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-506.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-103. Court-approved trusts - transfer of property for persons seeking medical assistance - rule-making authority for trusts created on or after July 1, 1994 - undue hardship.

The state board shall adopt such rules as are necessary with respect to trusts established pursuant to sections 15-14-412.6 to 15-14-412.9. The state board shall adopt rules that address, but need not be limited to, the following:

The definition, including any limitations, of permissible distributions from trusts, taking federal guidelines into consideration;

Reasonable financial reimbursement or incentives to the state department, county departments of human or social services, and any other designated agencies for the efforts and expenses in monitoring trusts, and where necessary, for the recovery of trust property that has been improperly distributed or otherwise expended.

The state board shall comply with Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p (d)(5), as amended, which requires the state medicaid agency to establish procedures, in accordance with standards specified by the secretary of the United States department of health and human services, under which the state medicaid agency may waive the application of the general rules for considering trust property in determining eligibility for medical assistance if the applicant for medical assistance establishes that the application of the general rules would work an undue hardship on the individual.

The state department shall determine the feasibility of providing ongoing support of dependents by using the trust corpus during the life of the person for whom a trust is created or using the remainder of the trust after the death of the person for whom the trust was created. If the state department determines that it is feasible to provide that support, the state department shall seek a waiver from the federal government to permit the use of trust property for that purpose.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1911, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 445, § 112, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-506.6 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-6-104. Long-term care placements - comprehensive and uniform client assessment instrument - report - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that there is an increasing strain on long-term care services in the state; that the number of persons in need of long-term care continues to grow; that community-based resources are not integrated into a centralized system for referrals, assessment of needs, development of care plans, and case management; and that persons in need of long-term care services have difficulty accessing and using the current system, which is fragmented and which results in inappropriate placements.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that the state is in need of a long-term care system that organizes each long-term care client's entry, assessment of need, and service delivery into a single unified system; and that such system must include, at a minimum, a locally established single entry point administered by a designated entity, a single client assessment instrument and administrative process, targeted case management in order to maximize existing federal, state, and local funding, case management, and an accountability mechanism designed to assure that budget allocations are being effectively managed.

The general assembly therefore concludes that it is appropriate to develop and implement a comprehensive and uniform long-term care client assessment process and to study the establishment of a single entry point system that provides for the coordination of access and service delivery to long-term care clients at the local level, that is available to all persons in need of long-term care, and that is well managed and cost-efficient.

As used in this section and in sections 25.5-6-105 to 25.5-6-107, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Activities of daily living" means the basic self-care activities, including eating, bathing, dressing, transferring from bed to chair, bowel and bladder control, and independent ambulation.

"Case management services" means the assessment of a long-term care client's needs, the development and implementation of a care plan for such client, the coordination and monitoring of long-term care service delivery, the direct delivery of services as provided by this article or by rules adopted by the state board pursuant to this article, the evaluation of service effectiveness, and the reassessment of such client's needs, all of which shall be performed by a single entry point as defined in paragraph (k) of this subsection (2).

"Community-based" means services provided in an individual's home or in a homelike setting. "Community-based" does not include a hospital, hospital unit, nursing facility, or nursing home.

"Comprehensive and uniform client assessment process" means a standard procedure, which includes the use of a uniform assessment instrument, to measure a client's functional capacity, to determine the social and medical needs of a current or potential client of any long-term care program, and to target resources to the functionally impaired.

"Continuum of care" means an organized system of long-term care, benefits, and services to which a client has access and which enables a client to move from one level or type of care to another without encountering gaps in or barriers to service.

"Information and referral" means the provision of specific, accurate, and timely public information about services available to aging and disabled adults in need of long-term care and referral to alternative agencies, programs, and services based on client inquiries.

"Instrumental activities of daily living" means home management and independent living activities such as cooking, cleaning, using a telephone, shopping, doing laundry, providing transportation, and managing money.

"Long-term care" means those services designed to provide diagnostic, preventive, therapeutic, rehabilitative, supportive, and maintenance services for individuals who have chronic physical or mental impairments, or both, in a variety of institutional and noninstitutional settings, including the home, with the goal of promoting the optimum level of physical, social, and psychological functioning of the individuals.

"Resource development" means the study, establishment, and implementation of additional resources or services which will extend the capabilities of community long-term care systems to better serve long-term care clients.

"Screening" means a preliminary determination of need for long-term care services and, on the basis of such determination, the making of an appropriate referral for a client assessment in accordance with subsection (3) of this section or referral to another community resource to assist clients who are not in need of long-term care services.

"Single entry point" means the availability of a single access or entry point within a local area where a current or potential long-term care client can obtain long-term care information, screening, assessment of need, and referral to appropriate long-term care program and case management services.

On or before July 1, 1991, the state department shall establish, by rule in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., a comprehensive and uniform client assessment process for all individuals in need of long-term care, the purpose of which is to determine the appropriate services and levels of care necessary to meet clients' needs, to analyze alternative forms of care and the payment sources for such care, and to assist in the selection of long-term care programs and services that meet clients' needs most cost-efficiently.

Participation in the process shall be mandatory for clients of publicly funded long-term care programs, including, but not limited to, the following:

Nursing facilities;

Home- and community-based services for the elderly, the blind, and the disabled;

Alternative care facilities;

to (VI) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 437, § 1, effective August 5, 2008.)

(VII) Home health services for long-term care clients; and

(VIII) Repealed.

Private paying clients of long-term care programs may participate in the process for a fee to be established by the state department and adopted through rules.

The state department, through rules, shall develop and implement no later than July 1, 1991, a uniform long-term care client needs assessment instrument for all individuals needing long-term care. The instrument shall be used as part of the comprehensive and uniform client assessment process to be established in accordance with subsection (3)(a) of this section and shall serve the following functions:

To obtain information on each client's status in the following areas:

Activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living;

Physical health;

Cognitive and emotional well-being;

Social interaction and current support resources;

To assess each client's physical environment in terms of meeting the client's needs;

To obtain information on each client's payment sources, including obtaining financial eligibility information for publicly funded long-term care programs;

To disclose the need for more intensive needs assessments in areas such as nutrition, adult protection, dementia diseases and related disabilities, and mental health;

To prioritize a client's need for care using criteria established by the state department for specific publicly funded long-term care programs;

To serve as the functional assessment for the determinations of medical necessity.

On and after July 1, 1991, no publicly funded client shall be placed in a long-term care program unless such placement is in accordance with rules adopted by the state board in implementing this section.

Repealed.

On or before July 1, 2018, pursuant to the state department's ongoing stakeholder process relating to eligibility determination for long-term services and supports pursuant to this article, the state department shall select a needs assessment tool for persons receiving long-term services and supports, including persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are eligible for services pursuant to section 25.5-6-409. Once selected, the state department shall begin assessing client needs using the needs assessment tool as soon as practicable.

Pursuant to the state department's ongoing stakeholder process relating to eligibility determination for long-term services and supports pursuant to this article, the state department shall develop or select the needs assessment tool in collaboration with persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities who receive services, legal guardians, case managers, and any other stakeholders as determined by the state department.

The needs assessment tool developed or selected by the state department must include a reasonable reassessment process, set forth in state board rules, that allows a reassessment to be completed within thirty days after receipt of a request for reassessment made by a person with intellectual and developmental disabilities or his or her legal guardian.

Repealed.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1911, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4) added, p. 1393, § 2, effective May 30.

L. 2008:

(3)(b) amended, p. 437, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(5) added, (SB 16-192), ch. 256, p. 1051, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 2018:

(3)(b)(VIII) repealed, (SB 18-093), ch. 62, p. 610, § 5, effective August 8; IP(3)(d) and (3)(d)(IV) amended, (HB 18-1091), ch. 74, p. 643, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(6) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

25.5-6-105. Legislative declaration relating to implementation of single entry point system - repeal.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

A study of a single entry point system in accordance with former section 26-4.5-404, C.R.S., has been completed;

The establishment of a single entry point system for the coordination of access to existing services and service delivery for all long-term care clients at the local level can be implemented in a cost-efficient manner;

The implementation of a well-managed single entry point system will result in the utilization of more appropriate services by long-term care clients over time and will provide better information on the unmet service needs of clients; and

The implementation of a statewide single entry point system is a comprehensive undertaking and would be more conducive to a phased-in approach.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that it is appropriate to develop and implement, through four phases, a single entry point system for the state and, therefore, enacts sections 26-4-522 to 26-4-525, which were relocated to sections 25.5-6-106 and 25.5-6-107, respectively, in the 2006 recodification of this title, to provide for such development and implementation.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1914, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-521 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-106. Single entry point system - authorization - phases for implementation - services provided - repeal.

Authorization. The state board is hereby authorized to adopt rules providing for the establishment of a single entry point system that consists of single entry point agencies throughout the state for the purpose of enabling persons eighteen years of age or older in need of long-term care to access appropriate long-term care services.

Single entry point agencies - service programs - functions.

A single entry point agency must be an agency in a local community through which any person eighteen years of age or older who is in need of long-term care can access needed long-term care services. A single entry point agency may be a private, nonprofit organization; a county agency, including a county department of human or social services; a county nursing service; an area agency on aging; or a multicounty agency. Persons in need of specialized assistance such as services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities or behavioral or mental health disorders may be referred by a single entry point agency to programs under the department of human services.

The agency may serve private paying clients on a fee-for-service basis and shall serve clients of publicly funded long-term care programs, including, but not limited to, the following:

Nursing facility care;

Home- and community-based services for the elderly, blind, and disabled;

Repealed.

Long-term home health care, including services provided by a PACE organization providing a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly pursuant to section 25.5-5-412;

Home care allowance;

Alternative care facilities;

Adult foster care;

Certain in-home services available pursuant to the federal "Older Americans Act of 1965", as amended; and

Home- and community-based services for persons with brain injury.

The major functions of a single entry point shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

Providing information;

Screening and referral services;

Assessing clients' needs in accordance with section 25.5-6-104;

Developing plans of care for clients;

Determining payment sources available to clients for long-term care services;

Authorizing the provision of certain long-term care services, as designated by the state department;

Determining eligibility for certain long-term care programs, as designated by the state department;

Delivering case management services as an administrative function;

Targeting outreach efforts to those most at risk of institutionalization;

(IX.5) Informing eligible persons about the benefits of participating in the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly provided by a PACE organization pursuant to section 25.5-5-412 as an alternative to enrollment in a managed care organization, an organization contracted with the state department pursuant to part 4 of article 5 of this title, or other risk-bearing entity;

Identifying resource gaps and coordinating resource development;

Recovering overpayment of benefits in accordance with rules adopted by the state board;

Maintaining fiscal accountability; and

Rendering state certified services, as provided by state board rules, as a qualified and state certified agency.

State certification of a single entry point agency - quality assurance standards.

Upon selection of a single entry point agency, the state department shall contract with an agency for five years but shall recertify the agency annually based on an evaluation procedure provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3).

The state board shall adopt rules for the establishment of a quality assurance program for the purpose of monitoring the quality of services provided to clients and for recertifying single entry point agencies. The rules shall provide for: Procedures to evaluate the quality of services provided by the agency; an assessment of the agency's compliance with program requirements, including compliance with case management standards, which standards shall be adopted by the state department; an assessment of an agency's performance of administrative functions, including reasonable costs per client, timely responses, managing programs in one consolidated unit, on-site visits to clients, community coordination and outreach, and client monitoring; a determination as to whether targeted populations are being identified and served; and an evaluation concerning financial accountability.

The state department shall monitor each single entry point agency in the state for compliance with quality assurance standards adopted by the state and may provide for the implementation of sanctions at any time for noncompliance. In addition, each county department may enter into cooperative agreements or contracts with the single entry point agencies to assure quality performance by the single entry point agency serving such county.

Ongoing reimbursement to single entry points shall be contingent upon compliance with quality assurance standards.

State board rules adopted pursuant to this section must include the requirement that, on and after January 1, 2019, prior to employment, a single entry point agency shall submit the name of a person who will be providing direct care, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (3.5), to an at-risk adult, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (1.5), as well as any other required identifying information, to the department of human services for a check of the Colorado adult protective services data system pursuant to section 26-3.1-111, to determine if the person is substantiated in a case of mistreatment of an at-risk adult.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1915, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(2)(b)(IV) amended and (2)(c)(IX.5) added, (SB 12-023), ch. 94, p. 309, § 2, effective April 12.

L. 2017:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1329, § 206, effective May 25; (3)(e) added, (HB 17-1284), ch. 272, p. 1505, § 11, effective May 31.

L. 2018:

(2)(b)(III) repealed, (SB 18-093), ch. 62, p. 610, § 6, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(4) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-522 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

(1) For the "Older Americans Act of 1965", see Pub.L. 89-73, codified at 42 U.S.C. sec. 3001 et seq.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-093, see section 1 of chapter 62, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-6-107. Financing of single entry point system - repeal.

The single entry point system shall be financed with the following moneys:

Federal financial participation moneys available for case management for home- and community-based services pursuant to this article, and for administration of medical assistance programs, pursuant to Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended;

The state's share or contribution for specific long-term care programs in accordance with or pursuant to sections 26-1-122 and 26-2-114, C.R.S.;

County contributions, as follows:

The total for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1990, and for each fiscal year thereafter, which totals shall serve as the base for determining the contribution required in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c), of the following: The counties' five percent contribution for home care allowance and adult foster care services as required by section 26-1-122, C.R.S.

The amount contributed from each county in accordance with subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) after making an adjustment based on the percentage of an increase or decrease per fiscal year in the service costs for clients of such county. However, in no case shall a county be required under this subparagraph (II) to contribute more than a five percent increase in said service costs.

County contributions for client services made in accordance with subparagraph (I) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section shall be expended only for clients of the county providing said contribution.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1917, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-525 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-108. Legislative declaration - advisory committee - long-term care - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1917, § 7, effective July 1.

25.5-6-108.5. Community long-term care studies - authority to implement - alternative care facility report.

Subject to the receipt of sufficient moneys pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), the state department shall contract for one or more studies of the population of recipients receiving services under the home- and community-based waivers authorized pursuant to this article. The state department shall make necessary data available to the contractor, including but not limited to data on activities of daily living. In selecting a contractor to perform any study conducted pursuant to this subsection (1), the state department is not required to follow the competitive bidding requirements of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S. The state department shall provide copies of all studies conducted pursuant to this subsection (1) to members of the health and human services committees of the general assembly, or any successor committees, and to the members of the joint budget committee.

If a study conducted pursuant to this subsection (1) concludes that a program of home- and community-based services would result in cost savings, the state department shall seek any necessary federal authorization to implement the program. If federal authorization to implement the program is obtained, the state department shall request, through the state budget process, that the program be implemented. The state department shall report to the joint budget committee annually concerning the amount of any savings realized from the program.

The state department is authorized to seek and accept gifts, grants, or donations from private and public sources for the purposes of this subsection (1); except that the state department may not accept a gift, grant, or donation that is subject to conditions that are inconsistent with this subsection (1) or any other law of the state. The state department shall transmit all private and public moneys received through gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the department of health care policy and financing cash fund created in section 25.5-1-109.

Subject to the receipt of sufficient moneys, one of the studies contracted for pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include research and analysis of:

The number of recipients with incontinence, Alzheimer's disease, dementia, or other diagnoses of a chronic incapacitating condition that severely limit their activities of daily living who would benefit from receiving additional services through an alternative care facility thereby avoiding nursing home placement;

The actuarially sound rate for providing services for the recipients at an alternative care facility;

The amount of savings associated with providing services at an alternative care facility;

Recommendations for utilization controls or program controls for a program to provide services at an alternative care facility;

The experiences of the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly, created pursuant to section 25.5-5-412, with tiered rates for alternative care facilities, including cost savings or cost avoidance;

Other states' experiences with tiered rates for alternative care facilities, including cost savings or cost avoidance; and

Recommendations for maintaining or improving quality of care.

The study conducted pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be completed by January 1, 2012, and, if federal approval is obtained prior to final figure-setting for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2012, the state department shall submit a request through the budget process for implementation of the approved changes for that fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1053), ch. 276, p. 1264, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 2011:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 11-1242), ch. 271, p. 1231, § 2, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 276, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

25.5-6-109. Community long-term care - coordinated care pilot program - federal authorization - rules - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1921, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) and (7) amended, p. 2016, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2114, § 149, effective August 11.